Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska74-593
Track motor cars; failure to equip; violation; penalty.

Any railroad which uses or permits to be used on its line in this state a track motor car in violation of section 74-592 shall be guilty of a Class V misdemeanor.

Laws 1949, c. 217, § 2, p. 616;

Laws 1977, LB 39, § 185;

Laws 1994, LB 414, § 9.